Indiana, session 2026, SB67.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-18-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13. Indiana Public Land Study
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "public land" refers to Indiana's:
(1) state parks;
(2) state forests;
(3) fish and wildlife areas; and
(4) nature preserves.
Sec. 2. The department shall conduct and prepare a study of the
following topics:
(1) Opportunities to leverage Indiana's public lands to
improve public health outcomes without creating new
unfunded mandates.
(2) Options for implementing a consistent and efficient visitor
fee collection system at state fish and wildlife areas, including:
(A) potential fee structures, exemptions, and discounts;
SB 67—LS 6322/DI 150


(B) mechanisms for electronic and onsite fee collection that
minimize administrative burden;
(C) the feasibility of ensuring that collected fees are
dedicated to:
(i) operation;
(ii) maintenance;
(iii) access;
(iv) habitat; and
(v) safety improvements at fish and wildlife areas; and
(D) consideration of affordability and continued access for
Indiana:
(i) residents;
(ii) hunters;
(iii) anglers; and
(iv) other users.
(3) Development of a framework for mitigating the impacts of
natural disasters on public lands by:
(A) identifying key risks from:
(i) flooding;
(ii) severe storms;
(iii) wildfire risk;
(iv) invasive species outbreaks; and
(v) other hazards;
(B) creating:
(i) emergency plans for public lands;
(ii) resiliently designed properties; and
(iii) plans that prioritize protecting critical habitats and
infrastructure;
(C) coordinating with:
(i) local governments;
(ii) emergency management agencies; and
(iii) federal partners; and
(D) prioritizing recovery efforts using:
(i) existing resources;
(ii) federal assistance;
(iii) insurance; and
(iv) additional sources other than the state general fund.
Sec. 3. (a) In carrying out the study under section 3 of this
chapter, the department shall, to the greatest extent practicable,
use existing:
(1) data;
(2) analyses;
SB 67—LS 6322/DI 150


(3) partnerships; and
(4) staff capacity.
(b) The department may consult with:
(1) the Indiana department of health;
(2) the Indiana University School of Public Health;
(3) Purdue University;
(4) other institutions of higher education;
(5) health systems; or
(6) other relevant stakeholders that do not have a direct
financial interest in the outcome of the department's findings
or recommendations;
to identify available data, research, and best practices.
Sec. 4. (a) The department shall issue a report of its findings and
recommendations under section 3 of this chapter to the:
(1) governor;
(2) interim study committee on agriculture and natural
resources; and
(3) legislative council;
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 not later than November
1, 2027.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) may be
incorporated into or transmitted concurrently with any other
statutorily required report of the department to minimize
administrative burden.
Sec. 5. (a) The department shall carry out this chapter using
existing appropriations, federal funds, grants, and partnerships,
without requiring additional state general fund appropriations.
(b) This chapter does not:
(1) create a private right of action; or
(2) authorize new fees or taxes.
Recommendations regarding visitor fees at state fish and wildlife
areas shall be submitted to the general assembly for consideration
before implementation.
Sec. 6. This chapter expires July 1, 2028.
SB 67—LS 6322/DI 150


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Natural Resources, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 67, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to SB 67 as introduced.)
GLICK, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 0
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Engrossed Senate Bill 67, which is
eligible for third reading, be returned to second reading for purposes of
amendment.
YODER
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 67 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 1, delete lines 5 through 9.
Page 1, line 10, delete "Sec. 2." and insert "Sec. 1.".
Page 1, line 15, delete "Sec. 3." and insert "Sec. 2.".
Page 1, delete line 17.
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 2.
Page 2, line 3, delete "(2)" and insert "(1)".
Page 2, line 6, delete "(3)" and insert "(2)".
Page 2, line 24, delete "(4)" and insert "(3)".
Page 3, line 4, delete "Sec. 4." and insert "Sec. 3.".
Page 3, line 17, delete "stakeholders;" and insert "stakeholders that
do not have a direct financial interest in the outcome of the
department's findings or recommendations;".
Page 3, line 19, delete "Sec. 5." and insert "Sec. 4.".
Page 3, line 31, delete "Sec. 6." and insert "Sec. 5.".
SB 67—LS 6322/DI 150


Page 3, line 40, delete "Sec. 7." and insert "Sec. 6.".
(Reference is to SB 67 as printed January 6, 2026.)
YODER
SB 67—LS 6322/DI 150